Washington statutes.
RCW 42.23.020

Definitions.

For the purpose of chapter 268, Laws of 1961:

(1) "Municipality" shall include all counties, cities, towns, districts, and other municipal corporations and quasi municipal corporations organized under the laws of the state of Washington;

(2) "Municipal officer" and "officer" shall each include all elected and appointed officers of a municipality, together with all deputies and assistants of such an officer, and all persons exercising or undertaking to exercise any of the powers or functions of a municipal officer;

(3) "Contract" shall include any contract, sale, lease or purchase;

(4) "Contracting party" shall include any person, partnership, association, cooperative, corporation, or other business entity which is a party to a contract with a municipality.

[ 1961 c 268 s 3.]